California, session 20252026, AB1762.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22904.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:22904.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the City of Indio, the employees’ exclusive representative, and unrepresented employees may agree that the employer contribution for postretirement health coverage shall be subject to all of the following:(1) Credited years of service that the employee worked with the City of Indio.(2) A memorandum of understanding regarding postretirement health coverage mutually agreed upon through collective bargaining. This issue shall not be subject to the impasse procedures set forth in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1.(3) The employer contribution established by this section shall not be less than the adjusted employer contribution required by subdivision (b) of Section 22892.(b) This section does not apply to any employee who retired before the effective date of the memorandum of understanding. In the event that the memorandum of understanding establishes a retroactive effective date, this section applies only prospectively and any employee who retires before the memorandum of understanding is signed shall not be affected by it.(c) An agreement reached pursuant to subdivision (a) is not valid if it provides an employer contribution for employees with less than five years of credited service with the City of Indio.(d) The City of Indio shall provide, in the manner prescribed by the board, notice of the agreement established pursuant to this section and any additional information necessary to implement this section.(e) This section applies only to the City of Indio and only with regard to employees who are first hired on or after January 1, 2025, and elected officials who first served as elected officials on or after January 1, 2025.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances of postretirement health coverage with regard to employees of the City of Indio.